Utah statutes.
4-31-106.   Epidemic of contagious or infectious disease -- Condemnation or destruction of infected or exposed livestock -- Destruction of other property.

(1)  If there is an outbreak of contagious or infectious disease of epidemic proportion among domestic animals in this state that imperils livestock, the commissioner, with approval of the governor, may condemn, destroy, or dispose of any infected livestock or any livestock exposed to, or deemed by the commissioner capable of, communicating disease to other domestic animals.

(2)  The commissioner may, with gubernatorial approval, condemn and destroy any barns, sheds, corrals, pens, or other property necessary to prevent the spread of contagion or infection.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 331, 2012 General Session

